Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DAKOTA COUNTY; THOMPSON COUNTY PARK.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Metropolitan Council for a grant to Dakota County for the construction of outdoor recreation accessibility and inclusivity improvements at Thompson County Park. This appropriation includes money for an immersive nature play area, picnic and gathering areas, park entrance safety and wayfinding improvements, ravine overlook, and accessible trail upgrades. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end